test/src/gt-desc-yamls/verb-odd_gt-desc.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each verb:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Odd syllable verbs belonging to COASKKIT_IV, MUITAL_TV, MUITTASJ_TV, ALIST_IV, BEAGASJ_IV, HURAI_IV, LASSAN_IV, GEAGAT_TV

Tests:
  Verb - dálvvadit: # COASKKIT_IV
    dálvvadit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: dálvvada
    dálvvadit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: dálvvadii
    dálvvadit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Sg3: [dálvvadivččii, dálvvadivččui]
    dálvvadit+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [dálvvadeš, dálvvadeaš, dálvvadeažžá]
    dálvvadit+V+IV+Ger: dálvvadettiin
    dálvvadit+V+IV+Der/alla+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: dálvvadalai

  Verb - duippidit: # MUITAL_TV
    duippidit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: [duippidetne, duippide, duippidedne]
    duippidit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [duippidedje, duippide]
    duippidit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [duippidivččuime, duippidivččiime]
    duippidit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [duippidivčče, duippidivččo]
    duippidit+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [duippideš, duippideaš, duippideažžá]
    duippidit+V+TV+Ger: duippidettiin

  Verb - bisttašit: # MUITTASJ_TV
    bisttašit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: [bisttašetne, bisttaše, bisttašedne]
    bisttašit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [bisttašedje, bisttaše]
    bisttašit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [bisttašivččuime, bisttašivččiime]
    bisttašit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [bisttašivčče, bisttašivččo]
    bisttašit+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [bisttašeš, bisttašeaš, bisttašeažžá]
    bisttašit+V+TV+Ger: bisttašettiin

  Verb - huobastit: # ALIST_IV
    huobastit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: [huobastetne, huobaste, huobastedne]
    huobastit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [huobastedje, huobaste]
    huobastit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [huobastivččuime, huobastivččiime]
    huobastit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [huobastivčče, huobastivččo]
    huobastit+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [huobasteš, huobasteaš, huobasteažžá]
    huobastit+V+IV+Ger: huobastettiin

  Verb - bivššihit: # BEAGASJ_IV
    bivššihit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: [bivššihetne, bivššihe, bivššihedne]
    bivššihit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [bivššihedje, bivššihe]
    bivššihit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [bivššihivččuime, bivššihivččiime]
    bivššihit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [bivššihivčče, bivššihivččo]
    bivššihit+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [bivššiheš, bivššiheaš, bivššiheažžá]
    bivššihit+V+IV+Ger: bivššihettiin

  Verb - bohraidit: # HURAI_IV
    bohraidit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: [bohraidetne, bohraide, bohraidedne]
    bohraidit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [bohraidedje, bohraide]
    bohraidit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [bohraidivččuime, bohraidivččiime]
    bohraidit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [bohraidivčče, bohraidivččo]
    bohraidit+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [bohraideš, bohraideaš, bohraideažžá]
    bohraidit+V+IV+Ger: bohraidettiin

  Verb - čohkánit: # LASSAN_IV
    čohkánit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: [čohkánetne, čohkáne, čohkánedne, čohkanedne, čohkkane, čohkkanedne, čohkkanetne, čohkane, čohkanetne]
    čohkánit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [čohkánedje, čohkáne, čohkane, čohkanedje, čohkkane, čohkkanedje]
    čohkánit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [čohkánivččiime, čohkánivččuime, čohkanivččuime, čohkanivččiime, čohkkanivččuime, čohkkanivččiime]
    čohkánit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [čohkánivčče, čohkánivččo, čohkanivččo, čohkkanivččo, čohkanivčče, čohkkanivčče]
    čohkánit+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [čohkáneš, čohkáneaš, čohkáneažžá, čohkaneš, čohkaneaš, čohkaneažžá, čohkkaneš, čohkkaneaš, čohkkaneažžá]
    čohkánit+V+IV+Ger: [čohkánettiin, čohkanettiin, čohkkanettiin]

  Verb - buovadit: # GEAGAT_TV
    buovadit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: [buovadetne, buovade, buovadedne]
    buovadit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [buovadedje, buovade]
    buovadit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [buovadivččuime, buovadivččiime]
    buovadit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [buovadivčče, buovadivččo]
    buovadit+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [buovadeš, buovadeaš, buovadeažžá]
    buovadit+V+TV+Ger: buovadettiin
